Hawaii statutes.
§601-5 Independence of judiciary. The
judiciary branch and the several judges and other judicial officers thereof
shall be independent of both the executive and legislative departments. The
governor shall have no power to interfere with, alter, or overrule any order,
writ, judgment, or decision of any court, judge, or other judicial officer,
except in the exercise of the power to grant reprieves and pardons in pursuance
of law. [L 1892, c 57, §2; am L 1903, c 32, §1; RL 1925, §2212; RL 1935, §3571;
RL 1945, §9272; RL 1955, §213-2; HRS §601-5; am L 1974, c 159, §17]

Cross References

See Const. art. VI.

Rules of Court

See JC Canon 1.

Attorney General Opinions

Laws governing hours of work, vacation, etc., of all public
employees do not by coverage of employees in judiciary department impair the
judicial power. Att. Gen. Op. 63-20.

Case Notes

No court ought to give an order of which it would be unable
to compel the enforcement. 5 H. 669 (1878).

Court cannot supply a want in the law, or legislate and make
law. 8 H. 478 (1892).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next